Alabama, session 2026rs, SB176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 12-18-166 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§12-18-166
(a) No individual may participate in both a
supernumerary circuit clerk program and the Employees’
Retirement System based on the same service.
Page 1

Retirement System based on the same service.
SB176 INTRODUCED
(b) An individual who independently qualifies for a
supernumerary circuit clerk program and the Employees'
Retirement System based on separate years of service may
participate in both programs.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on July 1,
2026.
Page 2